New York, session 2025-2026, S9516.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 101 of the alco- 2 holic beverage control law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (xix) 3 to read as follows: 4 (xix) Any licensed manufacturer or wholesaler located on the fifth 5 floor of all that certain plot, piece or parcel of land, situate, lying 6 and being in the borough of Manhattan, city, county and state of New 7 York, bounded and described as follows: 8 Beginning at a point on the easterly side of Greene Street, distant 9 138 feet 6 inches southerly from the corner formed by the intersection 10 of the easterly side of Greene Street with the southerly side of Prince 11 Street; running thence easterly on a line parallel with the southerly 12 side of Prince Street and for part of the distance through a party wall, 13 100 feet 1/2 of an inch to the easterly face of the easterly wall of the 14 building on the premises herein described; thence southerly along said 15 easterly face and on a line parallel or nearly so with the easterly side 16 of Greene Street, 12 feet; thence easterly nearly parallel with the 17 southerly side of Prince Street and along the southerly line of ground 18 now or formerly belonging to William M. Simore, 100 feet 2-1/2 to the 19 westerly side of Mercer Street, with the southerly side of Prince 20 Street; thence southerly along the westerly side of Mercer Street, 50 21 feet to the southerly line of Lot 136 on the map of Bayard's West Farms; 22 thence westerly along said southerly line nearly parallel with the 23 southerly side of Prince Street and part of the distance through a 24 party wall, 100 feet 2 inches to the easterly face of the easterly wall EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15257-01-6 S. 9516 2 1 of the building on the premises therein described; thence southerly 2 along said easterly face and on a line parallel with the easterly side 3 of Greene Street, 25 feet 5 inches; thence westerly on a line nearly 4 parallel with the southerly side of Prince Street and part of the 5 distance through a party wall, 100 feet 1 inch to the easterly side of 6 Greene Street; and thence northerly along the easterly side of Greene 7 Street; and thence northerly along the easterly side of Greene Street, 8 87 feet 6 inches to the point or place of beginning. Provided however, 9 that with respect to such manufacturer's or wholesaler's interest in a 10 retail licensee, such interest must have been acquired prior to the 11 effective date of the chapter of the laws of two thousand twenty-six 12 which added this subparagraph. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 14 upon the sale or transfer of the parcel detailed in subparagraph (xix) 15 of paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 101 of the alcoholic bever- 16 age control law, as added by section one of this act, such subparagraph 17 shall expire and be deemed repealed unless the licensee immediately 18 obtains a leasehold upon such sale or transfer of such parcel as part of 19 the sale or transfer. If the licensee obtains such a leasehold, the 20 subparagraph pertaining to such parcel shall expire and be deemed 21 repealed upon the end or termination of such lease. The state liquor 22 authority shall notify the legislative bill drafting commission upon 23 notification by the licensee of the sale, transfer or termination of the 24 leasehold, or non-renewal of the leasehold of the parcels detailed in 25 subparagraph (xix) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 101 of 26 the alcoholic beverage control law in order that the commission may 27 maintain an accurate and timely effective data base of the official text 28 of the laws of the state of New York in furtherance of effectuating the 29 provisions of section 44 of the legislative law and section 70-b of the 30 public officers law.